Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2334
Retirement; prior service retirement benefit; how determined.

The prior service retirement benefit shall be a straight life annuity, payable monthly with the first payment made as of the annuity start date, in an amount determined in accordance with section 23-2333, except that if the monthly payment would be less than ten dollars, payments shall be made annually in advance with each annual payment equal to 11.54 multiplied by the monthly payment that would have been made in the absence of this restriction on small monthly payments, and no prior service retirement benefit shall be paid to any person who terminates his or her employment unless such person has been continuously employed by the county for ten or more years immediately prior to termination. An employee meeting such requirement and who terminates his or her employment shall not receive a prior service benefit determined in accordance with section 23-2333 prior to attaining age sixty-five.

Prior service retirement benefits shall be paid directly by the county to the retired employee.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 18, p. 408;

Laws 1973, LB 352, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 32, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 23-2318;

Laws 1994, LB 833, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 13.